By those that winnow with a winnowing
And those that bear the burden (of the rain)
And those that glide with ease (upon the sea)
And those who distribute (blessings) by command,
Lo! that wherewith ye are threatened is indeed true,
And lo! the judgment will indeed befall.
By the heaven full of paths,
Lo! ye, forsooth, are of various opinion (concerning the truth).
He is made to turn away from it who is (himself) averse.
Accursed be the conjecturers
Who are careless in an abyss!
They ask: When is the Day of Judgment ?
(It is) the day when they will be tormented at the Fire,
(And it will be said unto them): Taste your torment (which ye inflicted). This is what ye sought to hasten.
Lo! those who keep from evil will dwell amid gardens and watersprings,
Taking that which their Lord giveth them; for lo! aforetime they were doers of good;
They used to sleep but little of the night,
And ere the dawning of each day would seek forgiveness,
And in their wealth the beggar and the outcast had due share.
And in the earth are portents for those whose faith is sure.
And (also) in yourselves. Can ye then not see ?
And in the heaven is your providence and that which ye are promised;
And by the Lord of the heavens and the earth, it is the truth, even as (it is true) that ye speak.
Hath the story of Abrahams honoured guests reached thee (O Muhammad) ?
When they came in unto him and said: Peace! he answered, Peace! (and thought): Folk unknown (to me).
Then he went apart unto his housefolk so that they brought a fatted calf;
And he set it before them, saying: Will ye not eat ?
Then he conceived a fear of them. They said: Fear not! and gave him tidings of (the birth of) a wise son.
Then his wife came forward, making moan, and smote her face, and cried: A barren old woman!
They said: Even so saith thy Lord. Lo! He is the Wise, the Knower.
(Abraham) said: And (afterward) what is your errand, O ye sent (from Allah) ?
They said: Lo! we are sent unto a guilty folk,
That we may send upon them stones of clay,
Marked by thy Lord for (the destruction of) the wanton.
Then we brought forth such believers as were there.
But We found there but one house of those surrendered (to Allah).
And We left behind therein a portent for those who fear a painful doom.
And in Moses (too, there is a portent) when We sent him unto Pharaoh with clear warrant,
But he withdrew (confiding) in his might, and said: A wizard or a madman.
So We seized him and his hosts and flung them in the sea, for he was reprobate.
And in (the tribe of) Aad (there is a portent) when we sent the fatal wind against them.
It spared naught that it reached, but made it (all) as dust.
And in (the tribe of) Thamud (there is a portent) when it was told them: Take your ease awhile.
But they rebelled against their Lords decree, and so the thunderbolt overtook them even while they gazed;
And they were unable to rise up, nor could they help themselves.
And the folk of Noah aforetime. Lo! they were licentious folk.
We have built the heaven with might, and We it is Who make the vast extent (thereof).
And the earth have We laid out, how gracious is the Spreader (thereof)!
And all things We have created by pairs, that haply ye may reflect.
Therefor flee unto Allah; lo! I am a plain warner unto you from him.
And set not any other god along with Allah; lo! I am a plain warner unto you from Him.
Even so there came no messenger unto those before them but they said: A wizard or a madman!
Have they handed down (the saying) as an heirloom one unto another ? Nay, but they are froward folk.
So withdraw from them (O Muhammad), for thou art in no wise blameworthy,
And warn, for warning profiteth believers.
I created the jinn and humankind only that they might worship Me.
I seek no livelihood from them, nor do I ask that they should feed Me.
Lo! Allah! He it is that giveth livelihood, the Lord of unbreakable might.
And lo! for those who (now) do wrong there is an evil day like unto the evil day (which came for) their likes (of old); so let them not ask Me to hasten on (that day).
And woe unto those who disbelieve, from (that) their day which they are promised.
By the Mount,
And a Scripture inscribed
On fine parchment unrolled,
And the House frequented,
And the roof exalted,
And the sea kept filled,
Lo! the doom of thy Lord will surely come to pass;
There is none that can ward it off.
On the day when the heaven will heave with (awful) heaving,
And the mountains move away with (awful) movement,
Then woe that day unto the deniers
Who play in talk of grave matters;
The day when they are thrust with a (disdainful) thrust, into the fire of hell
(And it is said unto them): This is the Fire which ye were wont to deny.
Is this magic, or do ye not see ?
Endure the heat thereof, and whether ye are patient of it or impatient of it is all one for you. Ye are only being paid for what ye used to do.
Lo! those who kept their duty dwell in gardens and delight,
Happy because of what their Lord hath given them, and (because) their Lord hath warded off from them the torment of hell-fire.
(And it is said unto them): Eat and drink in health (as a reward) for what ye used to do,
Reclining on ranged couches. And we wed them unto fair ones with wide, lovely eyes.
And they who believe and whose seed follow them in faith, We cause their seed to join them (there), and We deprive them of nought of their (lifes) work. Every man is a pledge for that which he hath earned.
And We provide them with fruit and meat such as they desire.
There they pass from hand to hand a cup wherein is neither vanity nor cause of sin.
And there go round, waiting on them menservants of their own, as they were hidden pearls.
And some of them draw near unto others, questioning,
Saying: Lo! of old, when we were with our families, we were ever anxious;
But Allah hath been gracious unto us and hath preserved us from the torment of the breath of Fire.
Lo! we used to pray unto Him of old. Lo! He is the Benign, the Merciful.
Therefor warn (men, O Muhammad). By the grace of Allah thou art neither soothsayer nor madman.
Or say they: (he is) a poet, (one) for whom we may expect the accident of time ?
Say (unto them): Except (your fill)! Lo! I am with you among the expectant.
Do their minds command them to do this, or are they an outrageous folk ?
Or say they: He hath invented it ? Nay, but they will not believe!
Then let them produce speech the like thereof, if they are truthful.
Or were they created out of naught ? Or are they the creators ?
Or did they create the heavens and the earth ? Nay, but they are sure of nothing!
Or do they own the treasures of thy Lord ? Or have they been given charge (thereof) ?
Or have they any stairway (unto heaven) by means of which they overhear (decrees). Then let their listener produce some warrant manifest!
Or hath He daughters whereas ye have sons ?
Or askest thou (Muhammad) a fee from them so that they are plunged in debt ?
Or possess they the Unseen so that they can write (it) down ?
Or seek they to ensnare (the messenger) ? But those who disbelieve, they are the ensnared!
Or have they any god beside Allah ? Glorified be Allah from all that they ascribe as partner (unto Him)!
And if they were to see a fragment of the heaven falling, they would say: A heap of clouds.
Then let them be (O Muhammad), till they meet their day, in which they will be thunder-stricken,
A day in which their guile will naught avail them, nor will they be helped.
And verily, for those who do wrong, there is a punishment beyond that. But most of them know not.
So wait patiently (O Muhammad) for thy Lords decree, for surely thou art in Our sight; and hymn the praise of thy Lord when thou uprisest,
And in the night-time also hymn His praise, and at the setting of the stars.
By the Star when it setteth,
Your comrade erreth not, nor is deceived;
Nor doth he speak of (his own) desire.
It is naught save an inspiration that is inspired,
Which one of mighty powers hath taught him,
One vigorous; and he grew clear to view
When he was on the uppermost horizon.
Then he drew nigh and came down
Till he was (distant) two bows length or even nearer,
And He revealed unto His slave that which He revealed.
The heart lied not (in seeing) what it saw.
Will ye then dispute with him concerning what he seeth ?
And verily he saw him yet another time
By the lote-tree of the utmost boundary,
Nigh unto which is the Garden of Abode.
When that which shroudeth did enshroud the lote-tree,
The eye turned not aside nor yet was overbold.
Verily he saw one of the greater revelations of his Lord.
Have ye thought upon Al-Lat and Al-Uzza
And Manat, the third, the other ?
Are yours the males and His the females ?
That indeed were an unfair division!
They are but names which ye have named, ye and your fathers, for which Allah hath revealed no warrant. They follow but a guess and that which (they) themselves desire. And now the guidance from their Lord hath come unto them.
Or shall man have what he coveteth ?
But unto Allah belongeth the after (life), and the former.
And how many angels are in the heavens whose intercession availeth naught save after Allah giveth leave to whom He chooseth and accepteth.
Lo! it is those who disbelieve in the Hereafter who name the angels with the names of females.
And they have no knowledge thereof. They follow but a guess, and lo! a guess can never take the place of the truth.
Then withdraw (O Muhammad) from him who fleeth from Our remembrance and desireth but the life of the world.
Such is their sum of knowledge. Lo! thy Lord is Best Aware of him who strayeth, and He is Best Aware of him whom goeth right.
And unto Allah belongeth whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is in the earth, that He may reward those who do evil with that which they have done, and reward those who do good with goodness.
Those who avoid enormities of sin and abominations, save the unwilled offences - (for them) lo! thy Lord is of vast mercy. He is Best Aware of you (from the time) when He created you from the earth, and when ye were hidden in the bellies of your mothers. Therefor ascribe not purity unto yourselves. He is Best Aware of him who wardeth off (evil).
Didst thou (O Muhammad) observe him who turned away,
And gave a little, then was grudging ?
Hath he knowledge of the Unseen so that he seeth ?
Or hath he not had news of what is in the books of Moses
And Abraham who paid his debt:
That no laden one shall bear anothers load,
And that man hath only that for which he maketh effort,
And that his effort will be seen.
And afterward he will be repaid for it with fullest payment;
And that thy Lord, He is the goal;
And that He it is who maketh laugh, and maketh weep,
And that He it is Who giveth death and giveth life;
And that He createth the two spouses, the male and the female,
From a drop (of seed) when it is poured forth;
And that He hath ordained the second bringing forth;
And that He it is Who enricheth and contenteth;
And that He it is Who is the Lord of Sirius;
And that He destroyed the former (tribe of) Aad,
And (the tribe of) Thamud He spared not;
And the folk of Noah aforetime, Lo! they were more unjust and more rebellious;
And Al-Mutafikah He destroyed
So that there covered them that which did cover.
Concerning which then, of the bounties of thy Lord, canst thou dispute ?
This is a warner of the warners of old.
The threatened Hour is nigh.
None beside Allah can disclose it.
Marvel ye then at this statement,
And laugh and not weep,
While ye amuse yourselves ?
Rather prostrate yourselves before Allah and serve Him.
The hour drew nigh and the moon was rent in twain.
And if they behold a portent they turn away and say: Prolonged illusion.
They denied (the Truth) and followed their own lusts. Yet everything will come to a decision
And surely there hath come unto them news whereof the purport should deter,
Effective wisdom; but warnings avail not.
So withdraw from them (O Muhammad) on the day when the Summoner summoneth unto a painful thing.
With downcast eyes, they come forth from the graves as they were locusts spread abroad,
Hastening toward the summoner; the disbelievers say: This is a hard day.
The folk of Noah denied before them, yea, they denied Our slave and said: A madman; and he was repulsed.
So he cried unto his Lord, saying: I am vanquished, so give help.
Then opened We the gates of heaven with pouring water
And caused the earth to gush forth springs, so that the waters met for a predestined purpose.
And We carried him upon a thing of planks and nails,
That ran (upon the waters) in Our sight, as a reward for him who was rejected.
And verily We left it as a token; but is there any that remembereth ?
Then see how (dreadful) was My punishment after My warnings!
And in truth We have made the Quran easy to remember; but is there any that remembereth ?
(The tribe of) Aad rejected warnings. Then how (dreadful) was My punishment after My warnings.
Lo! We let loose on them a raging wind on a day of constant calamity,
Sweeping men away as though they were uprooted trunks of palm-trees.
Then see how (dreadful) was My punishment after My warnings!
And in truth We have made the Quran easy to remember; but is there any that remembereth ?
(The tribe of) Thamud rejected warnings
For they said; Is it a mortal man, alone among us, that we are to follow ? Then indeed we should fall into error and madness.
Hath the remembrance been given unto him alone among us ? Nay, but he is a rash liar.
(Unto their warner it was said): To-morrow they will know who is the rash liar.
Lo! We are sending the she-camel as a test for them; so watch them and have patience;
And inform them that the water is to be shared between (her and) them. Every drinking will be witnessed.
But they call their comrade and he took and hamstrung (her).
Then see how (dreadful) was My punishment after My warnings!
Lo! We sent upon them one Shout, and they became as the dry twigs (rejected by) the builder of a cattle-fold.
And in truth We have made the Quran easy to remember; but is there any that remembereth ?
The folk of Lot rejected warnings.
Lo! We sent a storm of stones upon them (all) save the family of Lot, whom We rescued in the last watch of the night,
As grace from Us. Thus We reward him who giveth thanks.
And he indeed had warned them of Our blow, but they did doubt the warnings.
They even asked of him his guests for an ill purpose. Then We blinded their eyes (and said): Taste now My punishment after My warnings!
And in truth the punishment decreed befell them early in the morning.
Now taste My punishment after My warnings!
And in truth We have made the Quran easy to remember; but is there any that remembereth ?
And warnings came in truth unto the house of Pharaoh
Who denied Our revelations, every one. Therefore We grasped them with the grasp of the Mighty, the Powerful.
Are your disbelievers better than those, or have ye some immunity in the scriptures ?
Or say they: We are a host victorious ?
The hosts will all be routed and will turn and flee.
Nay, but the Hour (of doom) is their appointed tryst, and the Hour will be more wretched and more bitter (than their earthly failure).
Lo! the guilty are in error and madness.
On the day when they are dragged into the Fire upon their faces (it is said unto them): Feel the touch of hell.
Lo! We have created every thing by measure.
And Our commandment is but one (commandment), as the twinkling of an eye.
And verily We have destroyed your fellows; but is there any that remembereth ?
And every thing they did is in the scriptures,
And every small and great thing is recorded.
Lo! the righteous will dwell among gardens and rivers,
Firmly established in the favour of a Mighty King.
The Beneficent
Hath made known the Quran.
He hath created man.
He hath taught him utterance.
The sun and the moon are made punctual.
The stars and the trees adore.
And the sky He hath uplifted; and He hath set the measure,
That ye exceed not the measure,
But observe the measure strictly, nor fall short thereof.
And the earth hath He appointed for (His) creatures,
Wherein are fruit and sheathed palm-trees,
Husked grain and scented herb.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
He created man of clay like the potters,
And the jinn did He create of smokeless fire.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Lord of the two Easts, and Lord of the two Wests!
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
He hath loosed the two seas. They meet.
There is a barrier between them. They encroach not (one upon the other).
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
There cometh forth from both of them the pearl and coral-stone.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
His are the ships displayed upon the sea, like banners.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Everyone that is thereon will pass away;
There remaineth but the Countenance of thy Lord of Might and Glory.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
All that are in the heavens and the earth entreat Him. Every day He exerciseth (universal) power.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
We shall dispose of you, O ye two dependents (man and jinn).
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
O company of jinn and men, if ye have power to penetrate (all) regions of the heavens and the earth, then penetrate (them)! Ye will never penetrate them save with (Our) sanction.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
There will be sent, against you both, heat of fire and flash of brass, and ye will not escape.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
And when the heaven splitteth asunder and becometh rosy like red hide -
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ? -
On that day neither man nor jinni will be questioned of his sin.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
The guilty will be known by their marks, and will be taken by the forelocks and the feet.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
This is hell which the guilty deny.
They go circling round between it and fierce, boiling water.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
But for him who feareth the standing before his Lord there are two gardens.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Of spreading branches.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Wherein are two fountains flowing.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Wherein is every kind of fruit in pairs.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Reclining upon couches lined with silk brocade, the fruit of both the gardens near to hand.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Therein are those of modest gaze, whom neither man nor jinni will have touched before them.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
(In beauty) like the jacynth and the coral-stone.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Is the reward of goodness aught save goodness ?
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
And beside them are two other gardens,
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Dark green with foliage.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Wherein are two abundant springs.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Wherein is fruit, the date-palm and pomegranate.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Wherein (are found) the good and beautiful -
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ? -
Fair ones, close-guarded in pavilions -
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ? -
Whom neither man nor jinni will have touched before them -
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Reclining on green cushions and fair carpets.
Which is it, of the favours of your Lord, that ye deny ?
Blessed be the name of thy Lord, Mighty and glorious!
When the event befalleth -
There is no denying that it will befall -
Abasing (some), exalting (others);
When the earth is shaken with a shock
And the hills are ground to powder
So that they become a scattered dust,
And ye will be three kinds:
(First) those on the right hand; what of those on the right hand ?
And (then) those on the left hand; what of those on the left hand ?
And the foremost in the race, the foremost in the race:
Those are they who will be brought nigh
In gardens of delight;
A multitude of those of old
And a few of those of later time.
On lined couches,
Reclining therein face to face.
There wait on them immortal youths
With bowls and ewers and a cup from a pure spring
Wherefrom they get no aching of the head nor any madness,
And fruit that they prefer
And flesh of fowls that they desire.
And (there are) fair ones with wide, lovely eyes,
Like unto hidden pearls,
Reward for what they used to do.
There hear they no vain speaking nor recrimination
(Naught) but the saying: Peace, (and again) Peace.
And those on the right hand; what of those on the right hand ?
Among thornless lote-trees
And clustered plantains,
And spreading shade,
And water gushing,
And fruit in plenty
Neither out of reach nor yet forbidden,
And raised couches;
Lo! We have created them a (new) creation
And made them virgins,
Lovers, friends,
For those on the right hand;
A multitude of those of old
And a multitude of those of later time.
And those on the left hand: What of those on the left hand ?
In scorching wind and scalding water
And shadow of black smoke,
Neither cool nor refreshing.
Lo! heretofore they were effete with luxury
And used to persist in the awful sin.
And they used to say: When we are dead and have become dust and bones, shall we then, forsooth, be raised again,
And also our forefathers ?
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Lo! those of old and those of later time
Will all be brought together to the tryst of an appointed day.
Then lo! ye, the erring, the deniers,
Ye verily will eat of a tree called Zaqqum
And will fill your bellies therewith;
And thereon ye will drink of boiling water,
Drinking even as the camel drinketh.
This will be their welcome on the Day of Judgment.
We created you. Will ye then admit the truth ?
Have ye seen that which ye emit ?
Do ye create it or are We the Creator ?
We mete out death among you, and We are not to be outrun,
That We may transfigure you and make you what ye know not.
And verily ye know the first creation. Why, then, do ye not reflect ?
Have ye seen that which ye cultivate ?
Is it ye who foster it, or are We the Fosterer ?
If We willed, We verily could make it chaff, then would ye cease not to exclaim:
Lo! we are laden with debt!
Nay, but we are deprived!
Have ye observed the water which ye drink ?
Is it ye who shed it from the raincloud, or are We the Shedder ?
If We willed We verily could make it bitter. Why then, give ye not thanks ?
Have ye observed the fire which ye strike out;
Was it ye who made the tree thereof to grow, or were We the grower ?
We, even We, appointed it a memorial and a comfort for the dwellers in the wilderness.
Therefor (O Muhammad), praise the name of thy Lord, the Tremendous.
Nay, I swear by the places of the stars -
And lo! that verily is a tremendous oath, if ye but knew -
That (this) is indeed a noble Quran
In a Book kept hidden
Which none toucheth save the purified,
A revelation from the Lord of the Worlds.
Is it this Statement that ye scorn,
And make denial thereof your livelihood ?
Why, then, when (the soul) cometh up to the throat (of the dying)
And ye are at that moment looking
- And We are nearer unto him than ye are, but ye see not -
Why then, if ye are not in bondage (unto Us),
Do ye not force it back, if ye are truthful ?
Thus if he is of those brought nigh,
Then breath of life, and plenty, and a Garden of delight.
And if he is of those on the right hand,
Then (the greeting) Peace be unto thee from those on the right hand.
But if he is of the rejecters, the erring,
Then the welcome will be boiling water
And roasting at hell-fire.
Lo! this is certain truth.
Therefor (O Muhammad) praise the name of thy Lord, the Tremendous.
All that is in the heavens and the earth glorifieth Allah; and He is the Mighty, the Wise.
His is the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth; He quickeneth and He giveth death; and He is Able to do all things.
He is the First and the Last, and the Outward and the Inward; and He is Knower of all things.
He it is Who created the heavens and the earth in six Days; then He mounted the Throne. He knoweth all that entereth the earth and all that emergeth therefrom and all that cometh down from the sky and all that ascendeth therein; and He is with you wheresoever ye may be. And Allah is Seer of what ye do.
His is the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth, and unto Allah (all) things are brought back.
He causeth the night to pass into the day, and He causeth the day to pass into the night, and He is knower of all that is in the breasts.
Believe in Allah and His messenger, and spend of that whereof He hath made you trustees; and such of you as believe and spend (aright), theirs will be a great reward.
What aileth you that ye believe not in Allah, when the messenger calleth you to believe in your Lord, and He hath already made a covenant with you, if ye are believers ?
He it is Who sendeth down clear revelations unto His slave, that He may bring you forth from darkness unto light; and lo! for you, Allah is Full of Pity, Merciful.
And what aileth you that ye spend not in the way of Allah when unto Allah belongeth the inheritance of the heavens and the earth ? Those who spent and fought before the victory are not upon a level (with the rest of you). Such are greater in rank than those who spent and fought afterwards. Unto each hath Allah promised good. And Allah is Informed of what ye do.
Who is he that will lend unto Allah a goodly loan, that He may double it for him and his may be a rich reward ?
On the day when thou (Muhammad) wilt see the believers, men and women, their light shining forth before them and on their right hands, (and wilt hear it said unto them): Glad news for you this day: Gardens underneath which rivers flow, wherein ye are immortal. That is the supreme triumph.
On the day when the hypocritical men and the hypocritical women will say unto those who believe: Look on us that we may borrow from your light! it will be said: Go back and seek for light! Then there will separate them a wall wherein is a gate, the inner side whereof containeth mercy, while the outer side thereof is toward the doom.
They will cry unto them (saying): Were we not with you ? They will say: Yea, verily; but ye tempted one another, and hesitated, and doubted, and vain desires beguiled you till the ordinance of Allah came to pass; and the deceiver deceived you concerning Allah;
So this day no ransom can be taken from you nor from those who disbelieved. Your home is the Fire; that is your patron, and a hapless journeys end.
Is not the time ripe for the hearts of those who believe to submit to Allahs reminder and to the truth which is revealed, that they become not as those who received the scripture of old but the term was prolonged for them and so their hearts were hardened, and many of them are evil-livers.
Know that Allah quickeneth the earth after its death. We have made clear Our revelations for you, that haply ye may understand.
Lo! those who give alms, both men and women, and lend unto Allah a goodly loan, it will be doubled for them, and theirs will be a rich reward.
And those who believe in Allah and His messengers, they are the loyal, and the martyrs are with their Lord; they have their reward and their light; while as for those who disbelieve and deny Our revelations, they are owners of hell-fire.
Know that the life of the world is only play, and idle talk, and pageantry, and boasting among you, and rivalry in respect of wealth and children; as the likeness of vegetation after rain, whereof the growth is pleasing to the husbandman, but afterward it drieth up and thou seest it turning yellow, then it becometh straw. And in the Hereafter there is grievous punishment, and (also) forgiveness from Allah and His good pleasure, whereas the life of the world is but matter of illusion.
Race one with another for forgiveness from your Lord and a Garden whereof the breadth is as the breadth of the heavens and the earth, which is in store for those who believe in Allah and His messengers. Such is the bounty of Allah, which He bestoweth upon whom He will, and Allah is of Infinite Bounty.
Naught of disaster befalleth in the earth or in yourselves but it is in a Book before we bring it into being - Lo! that is easy for Allah -
That ye grieve not for the sake of that which hath escaped you, nor yet exult because of that which hath been given. Allah loveth not all prideful boasters,
Who hoard and who enjoin upon the people avarice. And whosoever turneth away, still Allah is the Absolute, the Owner of Praise.
We verily sent Our messengers with clear proofs, and revealed with them the Scripture and the Balance, that mankind may observe right measure; and He revealed iron, wherein is mighty power and (many) uses for mankind, and that Allah may know him who helpeth Him and His messengers, though unseen. Lo! Allah is Strong, Almighty.
And We verily sent Noah and Abraham and placed the prophethood and the scripture among their seed, and among them there is he who goeth right, but many of them are evil-livers.
Then We caused Our messengers to follow in their footsteps; and We caused Jesus, son of Mary, to follow, and gave him the Gospel, and placed compassion and mercy in the hearts of those who followed him. But monasticism they invented - We ordained it not for them - only seeking Allahs pleasure, and they observed it not with right observance. So We give those of them who believe their reward, but many of them are evil-livers.
O ye who believe! Be mindful of your duty to Allah and put faith in His messenger. He will give you twofold of His mercy and will appoint for you a light wherein ye shall walk, and will forgive you. Allah is Forgiving, Merciful;
That the People of the Scripture may know that they control naught of the bounty of Allah, but that the bounty is in Allahs hand to give to whom He will. And Allah is of Infinite Bounty.
Allah hath heard the saying of her that disputeth with thee (Muhammad) concerning her husband, and complaineth unto Allah. And Allah heareth your colloquy. Lo! Allah is Hearer, Knower.
Such of you as put away your wives (by saying they are as their mothers) - They are not their mothers; none are their mothers except those who gave them birth - they indeed utter an ill word and a lie. And lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
Those who put away their wives (by saying they are as their mothers) and afterward would go back on that which they have said, (the penalty) in that case (is) the freeing of a slave before they touch one another. Unto this ye are exhorted; and Allah is Informed of what ye do.
And he who findeth not (the wherewithal), let him fast for two successive months before they touch one another; and for him who is unable to do so (the penance is) the feeding of sixty needy ones. This, that ye may put trust in Allah and His messenger. Such are the limits (imposed by Allah); and for disbelievers is a painful doom.
Lo! those who oppose Allah and His messenger will be abased even as those before them were abased; and We have sent down clear tokens, and for disbelievers is a shameful doom
On the day when Allah will raise them all together and inform them of what they did. Allah hath kept account of it while they forgot it. And Allah is Witness over all things.
Hast thou not seen that Allah knoweth all that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth ? There is no secret conference of three but He is their fourth, nor of five but He is their sixth, nor of less than that or more but He is with them wheresoever they may be; and afterward, on the Day of Resurrection, He will inform them of what they did. Lo! Allah is Knower of all things.
Hast thou not observed those who were forbidden conspiracy and afterward returned to that which they had been forbidden, and (now) conspire together for crime and wrongdoing and disobedience toward the messenger ? And when they come unto thee they greet thee with a greeting wherewith Allah greeteth thee not, and say within themselves: Why should Allah punish us for what we say ? Hell will suffice them; they will feel the heat thereof - a hapless journeys end!
O ye who believe! When ye conspire together, conspire not together for crime and wrongdoing and disobedience toward the messenger, but conspire together for righteousness and piety, and keep your duty toward Allah, unto whom ye will be gathered.
Lo! Conspiracy is only of the devil, that he may vex those who believe; but he can harm them not at all unless by Allahs leave. In Allah let believers put their trust.
O ye who believe! when it is said unto you, Make room! in assemblies, then make room; Allah will make way for you (hereafter). And when it is said, Come up higher! go up higher; Allah will exalt those who believe among you, and those who have knowledge, to high ranks. Allah is Informed of what ye do.
O ye who believe! When ye hold conference with the messenger, offer an alms before your conference. That is better and purer for you. But if ye cannot find (the wherewithal) then lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
Fear ye to offer alms before your conference ? Then, when ye do it not and Allah hath forgiven you, establish worship and pay the poor-due and obey Allah and His messenger. And Allah is Aware of what ye do.
Hast thou not seen those who take for friends a folk with whom Allah is wroth ? They are neither of you nor of them, and they swear a false oath knowingly.
Allah hath prepared for them a dreadful doom. Evil indeed is that which they are wont to do.
They make a shelter of their oaths and turn (men) from the way of Allah; so theirs will be a shameful doom.
Their wealth and their children will avail them naught against Allah. Such are rightful owners of the Fire; they will abide therein.
On the day when Allah will raise them all together, then will they swear unto Him as they (now) swear unto you, and they will fancy that they have some standing. Lo! is it not they who are the liars ?
The devil hath engrossed them and so hath caused them to forget remembrance of Allah. They are the devils party. Lo! is it not the devils party who will be the losers ?
Lo! those who oppose Allah and His messenger, they will be among the lowest.
Allah hath decreed: Lo! I verily shall conquer, I and My messengers. Lo! Allah is Strong, Almighty.
Thou wilt not find folk who believe in Allah and the Last Day loving those who oppose Allah and His messenger, even though they be their fathers or their sons or their brethren or their clan. As for such, He hath written faith upon their hearts and hath strengthened them with a Spirit from Him, and He will bring them into Gardens underneath which rivers flow, wherein they will abide. Allah is well pleased with them, and they are well pleased with Him. They are Allahs party. Lo! is it not Allahs party who are the successful ?
All that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth glorifieth Allah, and He is the Mighty, the Wise.
He it is Who hath caused those of the People of the Scripture who disbelieved to go forth from their homes unto the first exile. Ye deemed not that they would go forth, while they deemed that their strongholds would protect them from Allah. But Allah reached them from a place whereof they recked not, and cast terror in their hearts so that they ruined their houses with their own hands and the hands of the believers. So learn a lesson, O ye who have eyes!
And if Allah had not decreed migration for them, He verily would have punished them in the world, and theirs in the Hereafter is the punishment of the Fire.
That is because they were opposed to Allah and His messenger; and whoso is opposed to Allah, (for him) verily Allah is stern in reprisal.
Whatsoever palm-trees ye cut down or left standing on their roots, it was by Allahs leave, in order that He might confound the evil-livers.
And that which Allah gave as spoil unto His messenger from them, ye urged not any horse or riding-camel for the sake thereof, but Allah giveth His messenger lordship over whom He will. Allah is Able to do all things.
That which Allah giveth as spoil unto His messenger from the people of the townships, it is for Allah and His messenger and for the near of kin and the orphans and the needy and the wayfarer, that it become not a commodity between the rich among you. And whatsoever the messenger giveth you, take it. And whatsoever he forbiddeth, abstain (from it). And keep your duty to Allah. Lo! Allah is stern in reprisal.
And (it is) for the poor fugitives who have been driven out from their homes and their belongings, who seek bounty from Allah and help Allah and His messenger. They are the loyal.
Those who entered the city and the faith before them love those who flee unto them for refuge, and find in their breasts no need for that which hath been given them, but prefer (the fugitives) above themselves though poverty become their lot. And whoso is saved from his own avarice - such are they who are successful.
And those who came (into the faith) after them say: Our Lord! Forgive us and our brethren who were before us in the faith, and place not in our hearts any rancour toward those who believe. Our Lord! Thou art Full of Pity, Merciful.
Hast thou not observed those who are hypocrites, (how) they tell their brethren who disbelieve among the People of the Scripture: If ye are driven out, we surely will go out with you, and we will never obey anyone against you, and if ye are attacked we verily will help you. And Allah beareth witness that they verily are liars.
(For) indeed if they are driven out they go not out with them, and indeed if they are attacked they help them not, and indeed if they had helped them they would have turned and fled, and then they would not have been victorious.
Ye are more awful as a fear in their bosoms than Allah. That is because they are a folk who understand not.
They will not fight against you in a body save in fortified villages or from behind walls. Their adversity among themselves is very great. Ye think of them as a whole whereas their hearts are divers. That is because they are a folk who have no sense.
On the likeness of those (who suffered) a short time before them, they taste the ill-effects of their own conduct, and theirs is painful punishment.
(And the hypocrites are) on the likeness of the devil when he telleth man to disbelieve, then, when he disbelieveth saith: Lo! I am quit of thee. Lo! I fear Allah, the Lord of the Worlds.
And the consequence for both will be that they are in the Fire, therein abiding. Such is the reward of evil-doers.
O ye who believe! Observe your duty to Allah. And let every soul look to that which it sendeth on before for the morrow. And observe your duty to Allah. Lo! Allah is Informed of what ye do.
And be not ye as those who forgot Allah, therefor He caused them to forget their souls. Such are the evil-doers.
Not equal are the owners of the Fire and the owners of the Garden. The owners of the Garden, they are the victorious.
If We had caused this Quran to descend upon a mountain, thou (O Muhammad) verily hadst seen it humbled, rent asunder by the fear of Allah. Such similitudes coin We for mankind that haply they may reflect.
He is Allah, than Whom there is no other God, the Knower of the Invisible and the Visible. He is the Beneficent, Merciful.
He is Allah, than Whom there is no other God, the Sovereign Lord, the Holy One, Peace, the Keeper of Faith, the Guardian, the Majestic, the Compeller, the Superb. Glorified be Allah from all that they ascribe as partner (unto Him).
He is Allah, the Creator, the Shaper out of naught, the Fashioner. His are the most beautiful names. All that is in the heavens and the earth glorifieth Him, and He is the Mighty, the Wise.
O ye who believe! Choose not My enemy and your enemy for allies. Do ye give them friendship when they disbelieve in that truth which hath come unto you, driving out the messenger and you because ye believe in Allah, your Lord ? If ye have come forth to strive in My way and seeking My good pleasure, (show them not friendship). Do ye show friendship unto them in secret, when I am Best Aware of what ye hide and what ye proclaim ? And whosoever doeth it among you, he verily hath strayed from the right way.
If they have the upper hand of you, they will be your foes, and will stretch out their hands and their tongues toward you with evil (intent), and they long for you to disbelieve.
Your ties of kindred and your children will avail you naught upon the Day of Resurrection. He will part you. Allah is Seer of what ye do.
There is a goodly pattern for you in Abraham and those with him, when they told their folk: Lo! we are guiltless of you and all that ye worship beside Allah. We have done with you. And there hath arisen between us and you hostility and hate for ever until ye believe in Allah only - save that which Abraham promised his father (when he said): I will ask forgiveness for thee, though I own nothing for thee from Allah - Our Lord! In Thee we put our trust, and unto Thee we turn repentant, and unto Thee is the journeying.
Our Lord! Make us not a prey for those who disbelieve, and forgive us, our Lord! Lo! Thou, only Thou, are the Mighty, the Wise.
Verily ye have in them a goodly pattern for everyone who looketh to Allah and the Last Day. And whosoever may turn away, lo! still Allah, He is the Absolute, the Owner of Praise.
It may be that Allah will ordain love between you and those of them with whom ye are at enmity. Allah is Mighty, and Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
Allah forbiddeth you not those who warred not against you on account of religion and drove you not out from your homes, that ye should show them kindness and deal justly with them. Lo! Allah loveth the just dealers.
Allah forbiddeth you only those who warred against you on account of religion and have driven you out from your homes and helped to drive you out, that ye make friends of them. Whosoever maketh friends of them - (All) such are wrong- doers.
O ye who believe! When believing women come unto you as fugitives, examine them. Allah is Best Aware of their faith. Then, if ye know them for true believers, send them not back unto the disbelievers. They are not lawful for them (the disbelievers), nor are they (the disbelievers) lawful for them. And give them (the disbelievers) that which they have spent (upon them). And it is no sin for you to marry such women when ye have given them their dues. And hold not to the ties of disbelieving women; and ask for (the return of) that which ye have spent; and let them (the disbelievers) ask for that which they have spent. That is the judgment of Allah. He judgeth between you. Allah is Knower, Wise.
And if any of your wives have gone from you unto the disbelievers and afterward ye have your turn (of triumph), then give unto those whose wives have gone the like of that which they have spent, and keep your duty to Allah in Whom ye are believers.
O Prophet! If believing women come unto thee, taking oath of allegiance unto thee that they will ascribe no thing as partner unto Allah, and will neither steal nor commit adultery nor kill their children, nor produce any lie that they have devised between their hands and feet, nor disobey thee in what is right, then accept their allegiance and ask Allah to forgive them. Lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
O ye who believe! Be not friendly with a folk with whom Allah is wroth, (a folk) who have despaired of the Hereafter as the disbelievers despair of those who are in the graves.
All that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth glorifieth Allah, and He is the Mighty, the Wise.
O ye who believe! Why say ye that which ye do not ?
It is most hateful in the sight of Allah that ye say that which ye do not.
Lo! Allah loveth them who battle for His cause in ranks, as if they were a solid structure.
And (remember) when Moses said unto his people: O my people! Why persecute ye me, when ye well know that I am Allahs messenger unto you ? So when they went astray Allah sent their hearts astray. And Allah guideth not the evil-living folk.
And when Jesus son of Mary said: O Children of Israel! Lo! I am the messenger of Allah unto you, confirming that which was (revealed) before me in the Torah, and bringing good tidings of a messenger who cometh after me, whose name is the Praised One. Yet when he hath come unto them with clear proofs, they say: This is mere magic.
And who doeth greater wrong than he who inventeth a lie against Allah when he is summoned unto Al-Islam ? And Allah guideth not wrongdoing folk.
Fain would they put out the light of Allah with their mouths, but Allah will perfect His light however much the disbelievers are averse.
He it is Who hath sent His messenger with the guidance and the religion of truth, that He may make it conqueror of all religion however much idolaters may be averse.
O ye who believe! Shall I show you a commerce that will save you from a painful doom ?
Ye should believe in Allah and His messenger, and should strive for the cause of Allah with your wealth and your lives. That is better for you, if ye did but know.
He will forgive you your sins and bring you into Gardens underneath which rivers flow, and pleasant dwellings in Gardens of Eden. That is the supreme triumph.
And (He will give you) another (blessing) which ye love: help from Allah and present victory. Give good tidings (O Muhammad) to believers.
O ye who believe! Be Allahs helpers, even as Jesus son of Mary said unto the disciples: Who are my helpers for Allah ? They said: We are Allahs helpers. And a party of the Children of Israel believed, while a party disbelieved. Then We strengthened those who believed against their foe, and they became the uppermost.
All that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth glorifieth Allah, the Sovereign Lord, the Holy One, the Mighty, the Wise.
He it is Who hath sent among the unlettered ones a messenger of their own, to recite unto them His revelations and to make them grow, and to teach them the Scripture and wisdom, though heretofore they were indeed in error manifest,
Along with others of them who have not yet joined them. He is the Mighty, the Wise.
That is the bounty of Allah; which He giveth unto whom He will. Allah is of Infinite Bounty.
The likeness of those who are entrusted with the Law of Moses, yet apply it not, is as the likeness of the ass carrying books. Wretched is the likeness of folk who deny the revelations of Allah. And Allah guideth not wrongdoing folk.
Say (O Muhammad): O ye who are Jews! If ye claim that ye are favoured of Allah apart from (all) mankind, then long for death if ye are truthful.
But they will never long for it because of all that their own hands have sent before, and Allah is Aware of evil-doers.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Lo! the death from which ye shrink will surely meet you, and afterward ye will be returned unto the Knower of the Invisible and the Visible, and He will tell you what ye used to do.
O ye who believe! When the call is heard for the prayer of the day of congregation, haste unto remembrance of Allah and leave your trading. That is better for you if ye did but know.
And when the prayer is ended, then disperse in the land and seek of Allahs bounty, and remember Allah much, that ye may be successful.
But when they spy some merchandise or pastime they break away to it and leave thee standing. Say: That which Allah hath is better than pastime and than merchandise, and Allah is the Best of providers.
When the hypocrites come unto thee (O Muhammad), they say: We bear witness that thou art indeed Allahs messenger. And Allah knoweth that thou art indeed His messenger, and Allah beareth witness that the hypocrites indeed are speaking falsely.
They make their faith a pretext so that they may turn (men) from the way of Allah. Verily evil is that which they are wont to do,
That is because they believed, then disbelieved, therefore their hearts are sealed so that they understand not.
And when thou seest them their figures please thee; and if they speak thou givest ear unto their speech. (They are) as though they were blocks of wood in striped cloaks. They deem every shout to be against them. They are the enemy, so beware of them. Allah confound them! How they are perverted!
And when it is said unto them: Come! The messenger of Allah will ask forgiveness for you! they avert their faces and thou seest them turning away, disdainful.
Whether thou ask forgiveness for them or ask not forgiveness for them is all one for them; Allah will not forgive them. Lo! Allah guideth not the evil-living folk.
They it is who say: Spend not on behalf of those (who dwell) with Allahs messenger that they may disperse (and go away from you); when Allahs are the treasures of the heavens and the earth; but the hypocrites comprehend not.
They say: Surely, if we return to Al-Madinah the mightier will soon drive out the weaker; when might belongeth to Allah and to His messenger and to the believers; but the hypocrites know not.
O ye who believe! Let not your wealth nor your children distract you from remembrance of Allah. Those who do so, they are the losers.
And spend of that wherewith We have provided you before death cometh unto one of you and he saith: My Lord! If only thou wouldst reprieve me for a little while, then I would give alms and be among the righteous.
But Allah reprieveth no soul when its term cometh, and Allah is Informed of what ye do.
All that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth glorifieth Allah; unto Him belongeth Sovereignty and unto Him belongeth praise, and He is Able to do all things.
He it is Who created you, but one of you is a disbeliever and one of you is a believer, and Allah is Seer of what ye do.
He created the heavens and the earth with truth, and He shaped you and made good your shapes, and unto Him is the journeying.
He knoweth all that is in the heavens and the earth, and He knoweth what ye conceal and what ye publish. And Allah is Aware of what is in the breasts (of men).
Hath not the story reached you of those who disbelieved of old and so did taste the ill-effects of their conduct, and theirs will be a painful doom.
That was because their messengers (from Allah) kept coming unto them with clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty), but they said: Shall mere mortals guide us ? So they disbelieved and turned away, and Allah was independent (of them). Allah is Absolute, Owner of Praise.
Those who disbelieve assert that they will not be raised again. Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Yea, verily, by my Lord! ye will be raised again and then ye will be informed of what ye did; and that is easy for Allah.
So believe in Allah and His messenger and the light which We have revealed. And Allah is Informed of what ye do.
The day when He shall gather you unto the Day of Assembling, that will be a day of mutual disillusion. And whoso believeth in Allah and doeth right, He will remit from him his evil deeds and will bring him unto Gardens underneath which rivers flow, therein to abide for ever. That is the supreme triumph.
But those who disbelieve and deny Our revelations, such are owners of the Fire; they will abide therein - a hapless journeys end!
No calamity befalleth save by Allahs leave. And whosoever believeth in Allah, He guideth his heart. And Allah is Knower of all things.
Obey Allah and obey His messenger; but if ye turn away, then the duty of Our messenger is only to convey (the message) plainly.
Allah! There is no God save Him. In Allah, therefore, let believers put their trust.
O ye who believe! Lo! among your wives and your children there are enemies for you, therefor beware of them. And if ye efface and overlook and forgive, then lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
Your wealth and your children are only a temptation, whereas Allah! with Him is an immense reward.
So keep your duty to Allah as best ye can, and listen, and obey, and spend; that is better for your souls. And whoso is saved from his own greed, such are the successful.
If ye lend unto Allah a goodly loan, He will double it for you and will forgive you, for Allah is Responsive, Clement,
Knower of the Invisible and the Visible, the Mighty, the Wise.
O Prophet! When ye (men) put away women, put them away for their (legal) period and reckon the period, and keep your duty to Allah, your Lord. Expel them not from their houses nor let them go forth unless they commit open immorality. Such are the limits (imposed by) Allah; and whoso transgresseth Allahs limits, he verily wrongeth his soul. Thou knowest not: it may be that Allah will afterward bring some new thing to pass.
Then, when they have reached their term, take them back in kindness or part from them in kindness, and call to witness two just men among you, and keep your testimony upright for Allah. Whoso believeth in Allah and the Last Day is exhorted to act thus. And whosoever keepeth his duty to Allah, Allah will appoint a way out for him,
And will provide for him from (a quarter) whence he hath no expectation. And whosoever putteth his trust in Allah, He will suffice him. Lo! Allah bringeth His command to pass. Allah hath set a measure for all things.
And for such of your women as despair of menstruation, if ye doubt, their period (of waiting) shall be three months, along with those who have it not. And for those with child, their period shall be till they bring forth their burden. And whosoever keepeth his duty to Allah, He maketh his course easy for him.
That is the commandment of Allah which He revealeth unto you. And whoso keepeth his duty to Allah, He will remit from him his evil deeds and magnify reward for him.
Lodge them where ye dwell, according to your wealth, and harass them not so as to straiten life for them. And if they are with child, then spend for them till they bring forth their burden. Then, if they give suck for you, give them their due payment and consult together in kindness; but if ye make difficulties for one another, then let some other woman give suck for him (the father of the child).
Let him who hath abundance spend of his abundance, and he whose provision is measured, let him spend of that which Allah hath given him. Allah asketh naught of any soul save that which He hath given it. Allah will vouchsafe, after hardship, ease.
And how many a community revolted against the ordinance of its Lord and His messengers, and We called it to a stern account and punished it with dire punishment,
So that it tasted the ill-effects of its conduct, and the consequence of its conduct was loss.
Allah hath prepared for them stern punishment; so keep your duty to Allah, O men of understanding! O ye who believe! Now Allah hath sent down unto you a reminder,
A messenger reciting unto you the revelations of Allah made plain, that He may bring forth those who believe and do good works from darkness unto light. And whosoever believeth in Allah and doeth right, He will bring him into Gardens underneath which rivers flow, therein to abide for ever. Allah hath made good provision for him.
Allah it is who hath created seven heavens, and of the earth the like thereof. The commandment cometh down among them slowly, that ye may know that Allah is Able to do all things, and that Allah surroundeth all things in knowledge.
O Prophet! Why bannest thou that which Allah hath made lawful for thee, seeking to please thy wives ? And Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
Allah hath made lawful for you (Muslims) absolution from your oaths (of such a kind), and Allah is your Protector. He is the Knower, the Wise.
When the Prophet confided a fact unto one of his wives and when she afterward divulged it and Allah apprised him thereof, he made known (to her) part thereof and passed over part. And when he told it her she said: Who hath told thee ? He said: The Knower, the Aware hath told me.
If ye twain turn unto Allah repentant, (ye have cause to do so) for your hearts desired (the ban); and if ye aid one another against him (Muhammad) then lo! Allah, even He, is his Protecting Friend, and Gabriel and the righteous among the believers; and furthermore the angels are his helpers.
It may happen that his Lord, if he divorce you, will give him in your stead wives better than you, submissive (to Allah), believing, pious, penitent, devout, inclined to fasting, widows and maids.
O ye who believe! Ward off from yourselves and your families a Fire whereof the fuel is men and stones, over which are set angels strong, severe, who resist not Allah in that which He commandeth them, but do that which they are commanded.
(Then it will be said): O ye who disbelieve! Make no excuses for yourselves this day. Ye are only being paid for what ye used to do.
O ye who believe! Turn unto Allah in sincere repentance! It may be that your Lord will remit from you your evil deeds and bring you into Gardens underneath which rivers flow, on the day when Allah will not abase the Prophet and those who believe with him. Their light will run before them and on their right hands; they will say: Our Lord! Perfect our light for us, and forgive us! Lo! Thou art Able to do all things.
O Prophet! Strive against the disbelievers and the hypocrites, and be stern with them. Hell will be their home, a hapless journeys end.
Allah citeth an example for those who disbelieve: the wife of Noah and the wife of Lot, who were under two of Our righteous slaves yet betrayed them so that they (the husbands) availed them naught against Allah and it was said (unto them): Enter the Fire along with those who enter.
And Allah citeth an example for those who believe: the wife of Pharaoh when she said: My Lord! Build for me a home with thee in the Garden, and deliver me from Pharaoh and his work, and deliver me from evil-doing folk;
And Mary, daughter of Imran, whose body was chaste, therefor We breathed therein something of Our Spirit. And she put faith in the words of her Lord and His scriptures, and was of the obedient.
Blessed is He in Whose hand is the Sovereignty, and, He is Able to do all things.
Who hath created life and death that He may try you which of you is best in conduct; and He is the Mighty, the Forgiving,
Who hath created seven heavens in harmony. Thou (Muhammad) canst see no fault in the Beneficent Ones creation; then look again: Canst thou see any rifts ?
Then look again and yet again, thy sight will return unto thee weakened and made dim.
And verily We have beautified the worlds heaven with lamps, and We have made them missiles for the devils, and for them We have prepared the doom of flame.
And for those who disbelieve in their Lord there is the doom of hell, a hapless journeys end!
When they are flung therein they hear its roaring as it boileth up,
As it would burst with rage. Whenever a (fresh) host is flung therein the wardens thereof ask them: Came there unto you no warner ?
They say: Yea, verily, a warner came unto us; but we denied and said: Allah hath naught revealed; ye are in naught but a great error.
And they say: Had we been wont to listen or have sense, we had not been among the dwellers in the flames.
So they acknowledge their sins; but far removed (from mercy) are the dwellers in the flames.
Lo! those who fear their Lord in secret, theirs will be forgiveness and a great reward.
And keep your opinion secret or proclaim it, lo! He is Knower of all that is in the breasts (of men).
Should He not know what He created ? And He is the Subtile, the Aware.
He it is Who hath made the earth subservient unto you, so Walk in the paths thereof and eat of His providence. And unto Him will be the resurrection (of the dead).
Have ye taken security from Him Who is in the heaven that He will not cause the earth to swallow you when lo! it is convulsed ?
Or have ye taken security from Him Who is in the heaven that He will not let loose on you a hurricane ? But ye shall know the manner of My warning.
And verily those before them denied, then (see) the manner of My wrath (with them)!
Have they not seen the birds above them spreading out their wings and closing them ? Naught upholdeth them save the Beneficent. Lo! He is Seer of all things.
Or who is he that will be an army unto you to help you instead of the Beneficent ? The disbelievers are in naught but illusion.
Or who is he that will provide for you if He should withhold His providence ? Nay, but they are set in pride and frowardness.
Is he who goeth groping on his face more rightly guided, or he who walketh upright on a straight road ?
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): He it is who gave you being, and hath assigned unto you ears and eyes and hearts. Small thanks give ye!
Say: He it is Who multiplieth you in the earth, and unto Whom ye will be gathered.
And they say: When (will) this promise (be fulfilled), if ye are truthful ?
Say: The knowledge is with Allah only, and I am but a plain warner;
But when they see it nigh, the faces of those who disbelieve will be awry, and it will be said (unto them): This is that for which ye used to call.
Say (O Muhammad): Have ye thought: Whether Allah causeth me (Muhammad) and those with me to perish or hath mercy on us, still, who will protect the disbelievers from a painful doom ?
Say: He is the Beneficent. In Him we believe and in Him we put our trust. And ye will soon know who it is that is in error manifest.
Say: Have ye thought: If (all) your water were to disappear into the earth, who then could bring you gushing water ?
Nun. By the pen and that which they write (therewith),
Thou art not, for thy Lords favour unto thee, a madman.
And lo! thine verily will be a reward unfailing.
And lo! thou art of a tremendous nature.
And thou wilt see and they will see
Which of you is the demented.
Lo! thy Lord is Best Aware of him who strayeth from His way, and He is Best Aware of those who walk aright.
Therefor obey not thou the rejecters
Who would have had thee compromise, that they may compromise.
Neither obey thou each feeble oath-monger,
Detracter, spreader abroad of slanders,
Hinderer of the good, transgressor, malefactor
Greedy therewithal, intrusive.
It is because he is possessed of wealth and children
That, when Our revelations are recited unto him, he saith: Mere fables of the men of old.
We shall brand him on the nose.
Lo! We have tried them as We tried the owners of the garden when they vowed that they would pluck its fruit next morning,
And made no exception (for the Will of Allah);
Then a visitation from thy Lord came upon it while they slept
And in the morning it was as if plucked.
And they cried out one unto another in the morning,
Saying: Run unto your field if ye would pluck (the fruit).
So they went off, saying one unto another in low tones:
No needy man shall enter it to-day against you.
They went betimes, strong in (this) purpose.
But when they saw it, they said: Lo! we are in error!
Nay, but we are desolate!
The best among them said: Said I not unto you: Why glorify ye not (Allah) ?
They said: Glorified be our Lord! Lo! we have been wrong-doers.
Then some of them drew near unto others, self-reproaching.
They said: Alas for us! In truth we were outrageous.
It may be that our Lord will give us better than this in place thereof. Lo! we beseech our Lord.
Such was the punishment. And verily the punishment of the Hereafter is greater if they did but know.
Lo! for those who keep from evil are gardens of bliss with their Lord.
Shall We then treat those who have surrendered as We treat the guilty ?
What aileth you ? How foolishly ye judge!
Or have ye a scripture wherein ye learn
That ye shall indeed have all that ye choose ?
Or have ye a covenant on oath from Us that reacheth to the Day of Judgment, that yours shall be all that ye ordain ?
Ask them (O Muhammad) which of them will vouch for that!
Or have they other gods ? Then let them bring their other gods if they are truthful
On the day when it befalleth in earnest, and they are ordered to prostrate themselves but are not able,
With eyes downcast, abasement stupefying them. And they had been summoned to prostrate themselves while they were yet unhurt.
Leave Me (to deal) with those who give the lie to this pronouncement. We shall lead them on by steps from whence they know not.
Yet I bear with them, for lo! My scheme is firm.
Or dost thou (Muhammad) ask a fee from them so that they are heavily taxed ?
Or is the Unseen theirs that they can write (thereof) ?
But wait thou for thy Lords decree, and be not like him of the fish, who cried out in despair.
Had it not been that favour from his Lord had reached him he surely had been cast into the wilderness while he was reprobate.
But his Lord chose him and placed him among the righteous.
And lo! those who disbelieve would fain disconcert thee with their eyes when they hear the Reminder, and they say: Lo! he is indeed mad;
When it is naught else than a Reminder to creation.
The Reality!
What is the Reality ?
Ah, what will convey unto thee what the reality is!
(The tribes of) Thamud and Aad disbelieved in the judgment to come.
As for Thamud, they were destroyed by the lightning.
And as for Aad, they were destroyed by a fierce roaring wind,
Which He imposed on them for seven long nights and eight long days so that thou mightest have seen men lying overthrown, as they were hollow trunks of palm- trees.
Canst thou (O Muhammad) see any remnant of them ?
And Pharaoh and those before him, and the communities that were destroyed, brought error,
And they disobeyed the messenger of their Lord, therefor did He grip them with a tightening grip.
Lo! when the waters rose, We carried you upon the ship
That We might make it a memorial for you, and that remembering ears (that heard the story) might remember.
And when the trumpet shall sound one blast
And the earth with the mountains shall be lifted up and crushed with one crash,
Then, on that day will the Event befall.
And the heaven will split asunder, for that day it will be frail.
And the angels will be on the sides thereof, and eight will uphold the Throne of thy Lord that day, above them.
On that day ye will be exposed; not a secret of you will be hidden.
Then, as for him who is given his record in his right hand, he will say: Take, read my book!
Surely I knew that I should have to meet my reckoning.
Then he will be in blissful state
In a high garden
Whereof the clusters are in easy reach.
(And it will be said unto those therein): Eat and drink at ease for that which ye sent on before you in past days.
But as for him who is given his record in his left hand, he will say: Oh, would that I had not been given my book
And knew not what my reckoning!
Oh, would that it had been death!
My wealth hath not availed me,
My power hath gone from me.
(It will be said): Take him and fetter him
And then expose him to hell-fire
And then insert him in a chain whereof the length is seventy cubits.
Lo! He used not to believe in Allah the Tremendous,
And urged not on the feeding of the wretched.
Therefor hath he no lover here this day,
Nor any food save filth
Which none but sinners eat.
But nay! I swear by all that ye see
And all that ye see not
That it is indeed the speech of an illustrious messenger.
It is not poets speech - little is it that ye believe!
Nor diviners speech - little is it that ye remember!
It is a revelation from the Lord of the Worlds.
And if he had invented false sayings concerning Us,
We assuredly had taken him by the right hand
And then severed his life-artery,
And not one of you could have held Us off from him.
And lo! it is a warrant unto those who ward off (evil).
And lo! We know that some among you will deny (it).
And lo! it is indeed an anguish for the disbelievers.
And lo! it is absolute truth.
So glorify the name of thy Tremendous Lord.
A questioner questioned concerning the doom about to fall
Upon the disbelievers, which none can repel,
From Allah, Lord of the Ascending Stairways
(Whereby) the angels and the Spirit ascend unto Him in a Day whereof the span is fifty thousand years.
But be patient (O Muhammad) with a patience fair to see.
Lo! they behold it afar off
While we behold it nigh:
The day when the sky will become as molten copper,
And the hills become as flakes of wool,
And no familiar friend will ask a question of his friend
Though they will be given sight of them. The guilty man will long to be able to ransom himself from the punishment of that day at the price of his children
And his spouse and his brother
And his kin that harboured him
And all that are in the earth, if then it might deliver him.
But nay! for lo! it is the fire of hell
Eager to roast;
It calleth him who turned and fled (from truth),
And hoarded (wealth) and withheld it.
Lo! man was created anxious,
Fretful when evil befalleth him
And, when good befalleth him, grudging;
Save worshippers.
Who are constant at their worship
And in whose wealth there is a right acknowledged
For the beggar and the destitute;
And those who believe in the Day of Judgment,
And those who are fearful of their Lords doom -
Lo! the doom of their Lord is that before which none can feel secure -
And those who preserve their chastity
Save with their wives and those whom their right hands possess, for thus they are not blameworthy;
But whoso seeketh more than that, those are they who are transgressors;
And those who keep their pledges and their covenant,
And those who stand by their testimony
And those who are attentive at their worship.
These will dwell in Gardens, honoured.
What aileth those who disbelieve, that they keep staring toward thee (O Muhammad), open-eyed,
On the right and on the left, in groups ?
Doth every man among them hope to enter the Garden of Delight ?
Nay, verily. Lo! We created them from what they know.
But nay! I swear by the Lord of the rising-places and the setting-places of the planets that We verily are Able
To replace them by (others) better than them. And we are not to be outrun.
So let them chat and play until they meet their Day which they are promised,
The day when they come forth from the graves in haste, as racing to a goal,
With eyes aghast, abasement stupefying them: Such is the Day which they are promised.
Lo! We sent Noah unto his people (saying): Warn thy people ere the painful doom come unto them.
He said: O my people! Lo! I am a plain warner unto you
(Bidding you): Serve Allah and keep your duty unto Him and obey me,
That He may forgive you somewhat of your sins and respite you to an appointed term. Lo! the term of Allah, when it cometh, cannot be delayed, if ye but knew.
He said: My Lord! Lo! I have called unto my people night and day
But all my calling doth but add to their repugnance;
And lo! whenever I call unto them that Thou mayst pardon them they thrust their fingers in their ears and cover themselves with their garments and persist (in their refusal) and magnify themselves in pride.
And lo! I have called unto them aloud,
And lo! I have made public proclamation unto them, and I have appealed to them in private.
And I have said: Seek pardon of your Lord. Lo! He was ever Forgiving.
He will let loose the sky for you in plenteous rain,
And will help you with wealth and sons, and will assign unto you Gardens and will assign unto you rivers.
What aileth you that ye hope not toward Allah for dignity
When He created you by (divers) stages ?
See ye not how Allah hath created seven heavens in harmony,
And hath made the moon a light therein, and made the sun a lamp ?
And Allah hath caused you to grow as a growth from the earth,
And afterward He maketh you return thereto, and He will bring you forth again, a (new) forthbringing.
And Allah hath made the earth a wide expanse for you
That ye may thread the valley-ways thereof.
Noah said: My Lord! Lo! they have disobeyed me and followed one whose wealth and children increase him in naught save ruin;
And they have plotted a mighty plot,
And they have said: Forsake not your gods. Forsake not Wadd, nor Suwa, nor Yaghuth and Yauq and Nasr.
And they have led many astray, and Thou increasest the wrong-doers in naught save error.
Because of their sins they were drowned, then made to enter a Fire. And they found they had no helpers in place of Allah.
And Noah said: My Lord! Leave not one of the disbelievers in the land.
If Thou shouldst leave them, they will mislead Thy slaves and will beget none save lewd ingrates.
My Lord! Forgive me and my parents and him who entereth my house believing, and believing men and believing women, and increase not the wrong-doers in aught save ruin.
Say (O Muhammad): It is revealed unto me that a company of the Jinn gave ear, and they said: Lo! we have heard a marvellous Quran,
Which guideth unto righteousness, so we believe in it and we ascribe no partner unto our Lord.
And (we believe) that He - exalted be the glory of our Lord! - hath taken neither wife nor son,
And that the foolish one among us used to speak concerning Allah an atrocious lie.
And lo! we had supposed that humankind and jinn would not speak a lie concerning Allah -
And indeed (O Muhammad) individuals of humankind used to invoke the protection of individuals of the jinn, so that they increased them in revolt against Allah);
And indeed they supposed, even as ye suppose, that Allah would not raise anyone (from the dead) -
And (the Jinn who had listened to the Quran said): We had sought the heaven but had found it filled with strong warders and meteors.
And we used to sit on places (high) therein to listen. But he who listeneth now findeth a flame in wait for him;
And we know not whether harm is boded unto all who are in the earth, or whether their Lord intendeth guidance for them.
And among us there are righteous folk and among us there are far from that. We are sects having different rules.
And we know that we cannot escape from Allah in the earth, nor can we escape by flight.
And when we heard the guidance, we believed therein, and whoso believeth in his Lord, he feareth neither loss nor oppression.
And there are among us some who have surrendered (to Allah) and there are among us some who are unjust. And whoso hath surrendered to Allah, such have taken the right path purposefully.
And as for those who are unjust, they are firewood for hell.
If they (the idolaters) tread the right path, We shall give them to drink of water in abundance
That We may test them thereby, and whoso turneth away from the remembrance of his Lord; He will thrust him into ever-growing torment.
And the places of worship are only for Allah, so pray not unto anyone along with Allah.
And when the slave of Allah stood up in prayer to Him, they crowded on him, almost stifling.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): I pray unto Allah only, and ascribe unto Him no partner.
Say: Lo! I control not hurt nor benefit for you.
Say: Lo! none can protect me from Allah, nor can I find any refuge beside Him
(Mine is) but conveyance (of the Truth) from Allah, and His messages; and whoso disobeyeth Allah and His messenger, lo! his is fire of hell, wherein such dwell for ever.
Till (the day) when they shall behold that which they are promised (they may doubt); but then they will know (for certain) who is weaker in allies and less in multitude.
Say (O Muhammad, unto the disbelievers): I know not whether that which ye are promised is nigh, or if my Lord hath set a distant term for it.
(He is) the Knower of the Unseen, and He revealeth unto none His secret,
Save unto every messenger whom He hath chosen, and then He maketh a guard to go before him and a guard behind him
That He may know that they have indeed conveyed the messages of their Lord. He surroundeth all their doings, and He keepeth count of all things.
O thou wrapped up in thy raiment!
Keep vigil the night long, save a little -
A half thereof, or abate a little thereof
Or add (a little) thereto - and chant the Quran in measure,
For we shall charge thee with a word of weight.
Lo! the vigil of the night is (a time) when impression is more keen and speech more certain.
Lo! thou hast by day a chain of business.
So remember the name of thy Lord and devote thyself with a complete devotion -
Lord of the East and the West; there is no God save Him; so choose thou Him alone for thy defender -
And bear with patience what they utter, and part from them with a fair leave- taking.
Leave Me to deal with the deniers, lords of ease and comfort (in this life); and do thou respite them awhile.
Lo! with Us are heavy fetters and a raging fire,
And food which choketh (the partaker), and a painful doom
On the day when the earth and the hills rock, and the hills become a heap of running sand.
Lo! We have sent unto you a messenger as witness against you, even as We sent unto Pharaoh a messenger.
But Pharaoh rebelled against the messenger, whereupon We seized him with no gentle grip.
Then how, if ye disbelieve, will ye protect yourselves upon the day which will turn children grey,
The very heaven being then rent asunder. His promise is to be fulfilled.
Lo! This is a Reminder. Let him who will, then, choose a way unto his Lord.
Lo! thy Lord knoweth how thou keepest vigil sometimes nearly two-thirds of the night, or (sometimes) half or a third thereof, as do a party of those with thee. Allah measureth the night and the day. He knoweth that ye count it not, and turneth unto you in mercy. Recite, then, of the Quran that which is easy for you. He knoweth that there are sick folk among you, while others travel in the land in search of Allahs bounty, and others (still) are fighting for the cause of Allah. So recite of it that which is easy (for you), and establish worship and pay the poor-due, and (so) lend unto Allah a goodly loan. Whatsoever good ye send before you for your souls, ye will find it with Allah, better and greater in the recompense. And seek forgiveness of Allah. Lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
O thou enveloped in thy cloak,
Arise and warn!
Thy Lord magnify,
Thy raiment purify,
Pollution shun!
And show not favour, seeking wordly gain!
For the sake of thy Lord, be patient!
For when the trumpet shall sound,
Surely that day will be a day of anguish,
Not of ease, for disbelievers.
Leave Me (to deal) with him whom I created lonely,
And then bestowed upon him ample means,
And sons abiding in his presence
And made (life) smooth for him.
Yet he desireth that I should give more.
Nay! For lo! he hath been stubborn to Our revelations.
On him I shall impose a fearful doom.
For lo! he did consider; then he planned -
(Self-)destroyed is he, how he planned!
Again (self-)destroyed is he, how he planned! -
Then looked he,
Then frowned he and showed displeasure.
Then turned he away in pride
And said: This is naught else than magic from of old;
This is naught else than speech of mortal man.
Him shall I fling unto the burning.
- Ah, what will convey unto thee what that burning is! -
It leaveth naught; it spareth naught
It shrivelleth the man.
Above it are nineteen.
We have appointed only angels to be wardens of the Fire, and their number have We made to be a stumbling-block for those who disbelieve; that those to whom the Scripture hath been given may have certainty, and that believers may increase in faith; and that those to whom the Scripture hath been given and believers may not doubt; and that those in whose hearts there is disease, and disbelievers, may say: What meaneth Allah by this similitude ? Thus Allah sendeth astray whom He will, and whom He will He guideth. None knoweth the hosts of thy Lord save Him. This is naught else than a Reminder unto mortals.
Nay, by the Moon
And the night when it withdraweth
And the dawn when it shineth forth,
Lo! this is one of the greatest (portents)
As a warning unto men,
Unto him of you who will advance or hang back.
Every soul is a pledge for its own deeds;
Save those who will stand on the right hand.
In gardens they will ask one another
Concerning the guilty:
What hath brought you to this burning ?
They will answer: We were not of those who prayed
Nor did we feed the wretched.
We used to wade (in vain dispute) with (all) waders,
And we used to deny the Day of Judgment,
Till the Inevitable came unto us.
The mediation of no mediators will avail them then.
Why now turn they away from the Admonishment,
As they were frightened asses
Fleeing from a lion ?
Nay, but everyone of them desireth that he should be given open pages (from Allah).
Nay, verily. They fear not the Hereafter.
Nay, verily. Lo! this is an Admonishment.
So whosoever will may heed.
And they will not heed unless Allah willeth (it). He is the fount of fear. He is the fount of Mercy.
Nay, I swear by the Day of Resurrection;
Nay, I swear by the accusing soul (that this Scripture is true).
Thinketh man that We shall not assemble his bones ?
Yea, verily. We are Able to restore his very fingers!
But man would fain deny what is before him.
He asketh: When will be this Day of Resurrection ?
But when sight is confounded
And the moon is eclipsed
And sun and moon are united,
On that day man will cry: Whither to flee!
Alas! No refuge!
Unto thy Lord is the recourse that day.
On that day man is told the tale of that which he hath sent before and left behind.
Oh, but man is a telling witness against himself,
Although he tender his excuses.
Stir not thy tongue herewith to hasten it.
Lo! upon Us (resteth) the putting together thereof and the reading thereof.
And when We read it, follow thou the reading;
Then lo! upon Us (resteth) the explanation thereof.
Nay, but ye do love the fleeting Now
And neglect the Hereafter.
That day will faces be resplendent,
Looking toward their Lord;
And that day will other faces be despondent,
Thou wilt know that some great disaster is about to fall on them.
Nay, but when the life cometh up to the throat
And men say: Where is the wizard (who can save him now) ?
And he knoweth that it is the parting;
And agony is heaped on agony;
Unto thy Lord that day will be the driving.
For he neither trusted, nor prayed.
But he denied and flouted.
Then went he to his folk with glee.
Nearer unto thee and nearer,
Again nearer unto thee and nearer (is the doom).
Thinketh man that he is to be left aimless ?
Was he not a drop of fluid which gushed forth ?
Then he became a clot; then (Allah) shaped and fashioned
And made of him a pair, the male and female.
Is not He (Who doeth so) Able to bring the dead to life ?
Hath there come upon man (ever) any period of time in which he was a thing unremembered ?
Lo! We create man from a drop of thickened fluid to test him; so We make him hearing, knowing.
Lo! We have shown him the way, whether he be grateful or disbelieving.
Lo! We have prepared for disbelievers manacles and carcans and a raging fire.
Lo! the righteous shall drink of a cup whereof the mixture is of Kafur,
A spring wherefrom the slaves of Allah drink, making it gush forth abundantly,
(Because) they perform the vow and fear a day whereof the evil is wide-spreading,
And feed with food the needy wretch, the orphan and the prisoner, for love of Him,
(Saying): We feed you, for the sake of Allah only. We wish for no reward nor thanks from you;
Lo! we fear from our Lord a day of frowning and of fate.
Therefor Allah hath warded off from them the evil of that day, and hath made them find brightness and joy;
And hath awarded them for all that they endured, a Garden and silk attire;
Reclining therein upon couches, they will find there neither (heat of) a sun nor bitter cold.
The shade thereof is close upon them and the clustered fruits thereof bow down.
Goblets of silver are brought round for them, and beakers (as) of glass
(Bright as) glass but (made) of silver, which they (themselves) have measured to the measure (of their deeds).
There are they watered with a cup whereof the mixture is of Zanjabil,
(The water of) a spring therein, named Salsabil.
There wait on them immortal youths, whom, when thou seest, thou wouldst take for scattered pearls.
When thou seest, thou wilt see there bliss and high estate.
Their raiment will be fine green silk and gold embroidery. Bracelets of silver will they wear. Their Lord will slake their thirst with a pure drink.
(And it will be said unto them): Lo! this is a reward for you. Your endeavour (upon earth) hath found acceptance.
Lo! We, even We, have revealed unto thee the Quran, a revelation;
So submit patiently to thy Lords command, and obey not of them any guilty one or disbeliever.
Remember the name of thy Lord at morn and evening.
And worship Him (a portion) of the night. And glorify Him through the livelong night.
Lo! these love fleeting life, and put behind them (the remembrance of) a grievous day.
We, even We, created them, and strengthened their frame. And when We will, We can replace them, bringing others like them in their stead.
Lo! this is an Admonishment, that whosoever will may choose a way unto his Lord.
Yet ye will not, unless Allah willeth. Lo! Allah is Knower, Wise.
He maketh whom He will to enter His mercy, and for evil-doers hath prepared a painful doom.
By the emissary winds, (sent) one after another
By the raging hurricanes,
By those which cause earths vegetation to revive;
By those who winnow with a winnowing,
By those who bring down the Reminder,
To excuse or to warn,
Surely that which ye are promised will befall.
So when the stars are put out,
And when the sky is riven asunder,
And when the mountains are blown away,
And when the messengers are brought unto their time appointed -
For what day is the time appointed ?
For the Day of Decision.
And what will convey unto thee what the Day of Decision is! -
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
Destroyed We not the former folk,
Then caused the latter folk to follow after ?
Thus deal We ever with the guilty.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
Did We not create you from a base fluid
Which We laid up in a safe abode
For a known term ?
Thus We arranged. How excellent is Our arranging!
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
Have We not made the earth a receptacle
Both for the living and the dead,
And placed therein high mountains and given you to drink sweet water therein ?
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
(It will be said unto them:) Depart unto that (doom) which ye used to deny;
Depart unto the shadow falling threefold,
(Which yet is) no relief nor shelter from the flame.
Lo! it throweth up sparks like the castles,
(Or) as it might be camels of bright yellow hue.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
This is a day wherein they speak not,
Nor are they suffered to put forth excuses.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
This is the Day of Decision, We have brought you and the men of old together.
If now ye have any wit, outwit Me.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
Lo! those who kept their duty are amid shade and fountains,
And fruits such as they desire.
(Unto them it is said:) Eat, drink and welcome, O ye blessed, in return for what ye did.
Thus do We reward the good.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
Eat and take your ease (on earth) a little. Lo! ye are guilty.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
When it is said unto them: Bow down, they bow not down!
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
In what statement, after this, will they believe ?
Whereof do they question one another ?
(It is) of the awful tidings,
Concerning which they are in disagreement.
Nay, but they will come to know!
Nay, again, but they will come to know!
Have We not made the earth an expanse,
And the high hills bulwarks ?
And We have created you in pairs,
And have appointed your sleep for repose,
And have appointed the night as a cloak,
And have appointed the day for livelihood.
And We have built above you seven strong (heavens),
And have appointed a dazzling lamp,
And have sent down from the rainy clouds abundant water,
Thereby to produce grain and plant,
And gardens of thick foliage.
Lo! the Day of Decision is a fixed time,
A day when the trumpet is blown and ye come in multitudes,
And the heaven is opened and becometh as gates,
And the hills are set in motion and become as a mirage.
Lo! hell lurketh in ambush,
A home for the rebellious.
They will abide therein for ages.
Therein taste they neither coolness nor (any) drink
Save boiling water and a paralysing cold:
Reward proportioned (to their evil deeds).
For lo! they looked not for a reckoning;
They called Our revelations false with strong denial.
Everything have We recorded in a Book.
So taste (of that which ye have earned). No increase do We give you save of torment.
Lo! for the duteous is achievement -
Gardens enclosed and vineyards,
And maidens for companions,
And a full cup.
There hear they never vain discourse, nor lying -
Requital from thy Lord - a gift in payment -
Lord of the heavens and the earth, and (all) that is between them, the Beneficent; with Whom none can converse.
On the day when the angels and the Spirit stand arrayed, they speak not, saving him whom the Beneficent alloweth and who speaketh right.
That is the True Day. So whoso will should seek recourse unto his Lord.
Lo! We warn you of a doom at hand, a day whereon a man will look on that which his own hands have sent before, and the disbeliever will cry: Would that I were dust!
By those who drag forth to destruction,
By the meteors rushing,
By the lone stars floating,
By the angels hastening,
And those who govern the event,
On the day when the first trump resoundeth.
And the second followeth it,
On that day hearts beat painfully
While eyes are downcast
(Now) they are saying: Shall we really be restored to our first state
Even after we are crumbled bones ?
They say: Then that would be a vain proceeding.
Surely it will need but one shout,
And lo! they will be awakened.
Hath there come unto thee the history of Moses ?
How his Lord called him in the holy vale of Tuwa,
(Saying:) Go thou unto Pharaoh - Lo! he hath rebelled -
And say (unto him): Hast thou (will) to grow (in grace) ?
Then I will guide thee to thy Lord and thou shalt fear (Him).
And he showed him the tremendous token.
But he denied and disobeyed,
Then turned he away in haste,
Then gathered he and summoned
And proclaimed: I (Pharaoh) am your Lord the Highest.
So Allah seized him (and made him) an example for the after (life) and for the former.
Lo! herein is indeed a lesson for him who feareth.
Are ye the harder to create, or is the heaven that He built ?
He raised the height thereof and ordered it;
And He made dark the night thereof, and He brought forth the morn thereof.
And after that He spread the earth,
And produced therefrom the water thereof and the pasture thereof,
And He made fast the hills,
A provision for you and for your cattle.
But when the great disaster cometh,
The day when man will call to mind his (whole) endeavour,
And hell will stand forth visible to him who seeth,
Then, as for him who rebelled
And chose the life of the world,
Lo! hell will be his home.
But as for him who feared to stand before his Lord and restrained his soul from lust,
Lo! the Garden will be his home.
They ask thee of the Hour: when will it come to port ?
Why (ask they) ? What hast thou to tell thereof ?
Unto thy Lord belongeth (knowledge of) the term thereof.
Thou art but a warner unto him who feareth it.
On the day when they behold it, it will be as if they had but tarried for an evening or the morn thereof.
He frowned and turned away
Because the blind man came unto him.
What could inform thee but that he might grow (in grace)
Or take heed and so the reminder might avail him ?
As for him who thinketh himself independent,
Unto him thou payest regard.
Yet it is not thy concern if he grow not (in grace).
But as for him who cometh unto thee with earnest purpose
And hath fear,
From him thou art distracted.
Nay, but verily it is an Admonishment,
So let whosoever will pay heed to it,
On honoured leaves
Exalted, purified,
(Set down) by scribes
Noble and righteous.
Man is (self-)destroyed: how ungrateful!
From what thing doth He create him ?
From a drop of seed. He createth him and proportioneth him,
Then maketh the way easy for him,
Then causeth him to die, and burieth him;
Then, when He will, He bringeth him again to life.
Nay, but (man) hath not done what He commanded him.
Let man consider his food:
How We pour water in showers
Then split the earth in clefts
And cause the grain to grow therein
And grapes and green fodder
And olive-trees and palm-trees
And garden-closes of thick foliage
And fruits and grasses:
Provision for you and your cattle.
But when the Shout cometh
On the day when a man fleeth from his brother
And his mother and his father
And his wife and his children,
Every man that day will have concern enough to make him heedless (of others).
On that day faces will be bright as dawn,
Laughing, rejoicing at good news;
And other faces, on that day, with dust upon them,
Veiled in darkness,
Those are the disbelievers, the wicked.
When the sun is overthrown,
And when the stars fall,
And when the hills are moved,
And when the camels big with young are abandoned,
And when the wild beasts are herded together,
And when the seas rise,
And when souls are reunited,
And when the girl-child that was buried alive is asked
For what sin she was slain,
And when the pages are laid open,
And when the sky is torn away,
And when hell is lighted,
And when the Garden is brought nigh,
(Then) every soul will know what it hath made ready.
Oh, but I call to witness the planets,
The stars which rise and set,
And the close of night,
And the breath of morning
That this is in truth the word of an honoured messenger,
Mighty, established in the presence of the Lord of the Throne,
(One) to be obeyed, and trustworthy;
And your comrade is not mad.
Surely he beheld Him on the clear horizon.
And he is not avid of the Unseen.
Nor is this the utterance of a devil worthy to be stoned.
Whither then go ye ?
This is naught else than a reminder unto creation,
Unto whomsoever of you willeth to walk straight.
And ye will not, unless (it be) that Allah willeth, the Lord of Creation.
When the heaven is cleft asunder,
When the planets are dispersed,
When the seas are poured forth,
And the sepulchres are overturned,
A soul will know what it hath sent before (it) and what left behind.
O man! What hath made thee careless concerning thy Lord, the Bountiful,
Who created thee, then fashioned, then proportioned thee ?
Into whatsoever form He will, He casteth thee.
Nay, but ye deny the Judgment.
Lo! there are above you guardians,
Generous and recording,
Who know (all) that ye do.
Lo! the righteous verily will be in delight.
And lo! the wicked verily will be in hell;
They will burn therein on the Day of Judgment,
And will not be absent thence.
Ah, what will convey unto thee what the Day of Judgment is!
Again, what will convey unto thee what the Day of Judgment is!
A day on which no soul hath power at all for any (other) soul. The (absolute) command on that day is Allahs.
Woe unto the defrauders:
Those who when they take the measure from mankind demand it full,
But if they measure unto them or weight for them, they cause them loss.
Do such (men) not consider that they will be raised again
Unto an Awful Day,
The day when (all) mankind stand before the Lord of the Worlds ?
Nay, but the record of the vile is in Sijjin -
Ah! what will convey unto thee what Sijjin is! -
A written record.
Woe unto the repudiators on that day!
Those who deny the Day of Judgment
Which none denieth save each criminal transgressor,
Who, when thou readest unto him Our revelations, saith: (Mere) fables of the men of old.
Nay, but that which they have earned is rust upon their hearts.
Nay, but surely on that day they will be covered from (the mercy of) their Lord.
Then lo! they verily will burn in hell,
And it will be said (unto them): This is that which ye used to deny.
Nay, but the record of the righteous is in Illiyin -
Ah, what will convey unto thee what Illiyin is! -
A written record,
Attested by those who are brought near (unto their Lord).
Lo! the righteous verily are in delight,
On couches, gazing,
Thou wilt know in their faces the radiance of delight.
They are given to drink of a pure wine, sealed,
Whose seal is musk - for this let (all) those strive who strive for bliss -
And mixed with water of Tasnim,
A spring whence those brought near (to Allah) drink.
Lo! the guilty used to laugh at those who believed,
And wink one to another when they passed them;
And when they returned to their own folk, they returned jesting;
And when they saw them they said: Lo! these have gone astray.
Yet they were not sent as guardians over them.
This day it is those who believe who have the laugh of disbelievers,
On high couches, gazing.
Are not the disbelievers paid for what they used to do ?
When the heaven is split asunder
And attentive to her Lord in fear,
And when the earth is spread out
And hath cast out all that was in her, and is empty
And attentive to her Lord in fear!
Thou, verily, O man, art working toward thy Lord a work which thou wilt meet (in His presence).
Then whoso is given his account in his right hand
He truly will receive an easy reckoning
And will return unto his folk in joy.
But whoso is given his account behind his back,
He surely will invoke destruction
And be thrown to scorching fire.
He verily lived joyous with his folk,
He verily deemed that he would never return (unto Allah).
Nay, but lo! his Lord is ever looking on him!
Oh, I swear by the afterglow of sunset,
And by the night and all that it enshroudeth,
And by the moon when she is at the full,
That ye shall journey on from plane to plane.
What aileth them, then, that they believe not
And, when the Quran is recited unto them, worship not (Allah) ?
Nay, but those who disbelieve will deny;
And Allah knoweth best what they are hiding.
So give them tidings of a painful doom,
Save those who believe and do good works, for theirs is a reward unfailing.
By the heaven, holding mansions of the stars,
And by the Promised Day.
And by the witness and that whereunto he beareth testimony,
(Self-)destroyed were the owners of the ditch
Of the fuel-fed fire,
When they sat by it,
And were themselves the witnesses of what they did to the believers.
They had naught against them save that they believed in Allah, the Mighty, the Owner of Praise,
Him unto Whom belongeth the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth; and Allah is of all things the Witness.
Lo! they who persecute believing men and believing women and repent not, theirs verily will be the doom of hell, and theirs the doom of burning.
Lo! those who believe and do good works, theirs will be Gardens underneath which rivers flow. That is the Great Success.
Lo! the punishment of thy Lord is stern.
Lo! He it is Who produceth, then reproduceth,
And He is the Forgiving, the Loving,
Lord of the Throne of Glory,
Doer of what He will.
Hath there come unto thee the story of the hosts
Of Pharaoh and (the tribe of) Thamud ?
Nay, but those who disbelieve live in denial
And Allah, all unseen, surroundeth them.
Nay, but it is a glorious Quran.
On a guarded tablet.
By the heaven and the Morning Star
- Ah, what will tell thee what the Morning Star is!
- The piercing Star!
No human soul but hath a guardian over it.
So let man consider from what he is created.
He is created from a gushing fluid
That issued from between the loins and ribs.
Lo! He verily is Able to return him (unto life)
On the day when hidden thoughts shall be searched out.
Then will he have no might nor any helper.
By the heaven which giveth the returning rain,
And the earth which splitteth (with the growth of trees and plants)
Lo! this (Quran) is a conclusive word,
It is no pleasantry.
Lo! they plot a plot (against thee, O Muhammad)
And I plot a plot (against them).
So give a respite to the disbelievers. Deal thou gently with them for a while.
Praise the name of thy Lord the Most High,
Who createth, then disposeth;
Who measureth, then guideth;
Who bringeth forth the pasturage,
Then turneth it to russet stubble.
We shall make thee read (O Muhammad) so that thou shalt not forget
Save that which Allah willeth. Lo! He knoweth the disclosed and that which still is hidden;
And We shall ease thy way unto the state of ease.
Therefor remind (men), for of use is the reminder.
He will heed who feareth,
But the most hapless will flout it,
He who will be flung to the great Fire
Wherein he will neither die nor live.
He is successful who groweth,
And remembereth the name of his Lord, so prayeth,
But ye prefer the life of the world
Although the Hereafter is better and more lasting.
Lo! This is in the former scrolls.
The Books of Abraham and Moses.
Hath there come unto thee tidings of the Overwhelming ?
On that day (many) faces will be downcast,
Toiling, weary,
Scorched by burning fire,
Drinking from a boiling spring,
No food for them save bitter thorn-fruit
Which doth not nourish nor release from hunger.
In that day other faces will be calm,
Glad for their effort past,
In a high Garden
Where they hear no idle speech,
Wherein is a gushing spring,
Wherein are couches raised
And goblets set at hand
And cushions ranged
And silken carpets spread.
Will they not regard the camels, how they are created ?
And the heaven, how it is raised ?
And the hills, how they are set up ?
And the earth, how it is spread ?
Remind them, for thou art but a remembrancer,
Thou art not at all a warder over them.
But whoso is averse and disbelieveth,
Allah will punish him with direst punishment.
Lo! unto Us is their return
And Ours their reckoning.
By the Dawn
And ten nights,
And the Even and the Odd,
And the night when it departeth,
There surely is an oath for thinking man.
Dost thou not consider how thy Lord dealt with (the tribe of) Aad,
With many-columned Iram,
The like of which was not created in the lands;
And with (the tribe of) Thamud, who clove the rocks in the valley;
And with Pharaoh, firm of might,
Who (all) were rebellious (to Allah) in these lands,
And multiplied iniquity therein ?
Therefore thy Lord poured on them the disaster of His punishment.
Lo! thy Lord is ever watchful.
As for man, whenever his Lord trieth him by honouring him, and is gracious unto him, he saith: My Lord honoureth me.
But whenever He trieth him by straitening his means of life, he saith: My Lord despiseth me.
Nay, but ye (for your part) honour not the orphan
And urge not on the feeding of the poor.
And ye devour heritages with devouring greed.
And love wealth with abounding love.
Nay, but when the earth is ground to atoms, grinding, grinding,
And thy Lord shall come with angels, rank on rank,
And hell is brought near that day; on that day man will remember, but how will the remembrance (then avail him) ?
He will say: Ah, would that I had sent before me (some provision) for my life!
None punisheth as He will punish on that day!
None bindeth as He then will bind.
But ah! thou soul at peace!
Return unto thy Lord, content in His good pleasure!
Enter thou among My bondmen!
Enter thou My Garden!
Nay, I swear by this city -
And thou art an indweller of this city -
And the begetter and that which he begat,
We verily have created man in an atmosphere:
Thinketh he that none hath power over him ?
And he saith: I have destroyed vast wealth:
Thinketh he that none beholdeth him ?
Did We not assign unto him two eyes
And a tongue and two lips,
And guide him to the parting of the mountain ways ?
But he hath not attempted the Ascent -
Ah, what will convey unto thee what the Ascent is! -
(It is) to free a slave,
And to feed in the day of hunger.
An orphan near of kin,
Or some poor wretch in misery,
And to be of those who believe and exhort one another to perseverance and exhort one another to pity.
Their place will be on the right hand.
But those who disbelieve Our revelations, their place will be on the left hand.
Fire will be an awning over them.
By the sun and his brightness,
And the moon when she followeth him,
And the day when it revealeth him,
And the night when it enshroudeth him,
And the heaven and Him Who built it,
And the earth and Him Who spread it,
And a soul and Him Who perfected it
And inspired it (with conscience of) what is wrong for it and (what is) right for it.
He is indeed successful who causeth it to grow,
And he is indeed a failure who stunteth it.
(The tribe of) Thamud denied (the truth) in their rebellious pride,
When the basest of them broke forth
And the messenger of Allah said: It is the she-camel of Allah, so let her drink!
But they denied him, and they hamstrung her, so Allah doomed them for their sin and rased (their dwellings).
He dreadeth not the sequel (of events).
By the night enshrouding
And the day resplendent
And Him Who hath created male and female,
Lo! your effort is dispersed (toward divers ends).
As for him who giveth and is dutiful (toward Allah)
And believeth in goodness;
Surely We will ease his way unto the state of ease.
But as for him who hoardeth and deemeth himself independent,
And disbelieveth in goodness;
Surely We will ease his way unto adversity.
His riches will not save him when he perisheth.
Lo! Ours it is (to give) the guidance
And lo! unto Us belong the latter portion and the former.
Therefor have I warned you of the flaming Fire
Which only the most wretched must endure,
He who denieth and turneth away.
Far removed from it will be the righteous
Who giveth his wealth that he may grow (in goodness).
And none hath with him any favour for reward,
Except as seeking (to fulfil) the purpose of his Lord Most High.
He verily will be content.
By the morning hours
And by the night when it is stillest,
Thy Lord hath not forsaken thee nor doth He hate thee,
And verily the latter portion will be better for thee than the former,
And verily thy Lord will give unto thee so that thou wilt be content.
Did He not find thee an orphan and protect (thee) ?
Did He not find thee wandering and direct (thee) ?
Did He not find thee destitute and enrich (thee) ?
Therefor the orphan oppress not,
Therefor the beggar drive not away,
Therefor of the bounty of thy Lord be thy discourse.
Have We not caused thy bosom to dilate,
And eased thee of the burden
Which weighed down thy back;
And exalted thy fame ?
But lo! with hardship goeth ease,
Lo! with hardship goeth ease;
So when thou art relieved, still toil
And strive to please thy Lord.
By the fig and the olive,
By Mount Sinai,
And by this land made safe;
Surely We created man of the best stature
Then we reduced him to the lowest of the low,
Save those who believe and do good works, and theirs is a reward unfailing.
So who henceforth will give the lie to thee about the judgment ?
Is not Allah the most conclusive of all judges ?
Read: In the name of thy Lord Who createth,
Createth man from a clot.
Read: And thy Lord is the Most Bounteous,
Who teacheth by the pen,
Teacheth man that which he knew not.
Nay, but verily man is rebellious
That he thinketh himself independent!
Lo! unto thy Lord is the return.
Hast thou seen him who dissuadeth
A slave when he prayeth ?
Hast thou seen if he relieth on the guidance (of Allah)
Or enjoineth piety ?
Hast thou seen if he denieth (Allahs guidance) and is froward ?
Is he then unaware that Allah seeth ?
Nay, but if he cease not We will seize him by the forelock -
The lying, sinful forelock -
Then let him call upon his henchmen!
We will call the guards of hell.
Nay, Obey not thou him. But prostrate thyself, and draw near (unto Allah).
Lo! We revealed it on the Night of Predestination.
Ah, what will convey unto thee what the Night of Power is!
The Night of Power is better than a thousand months.
The angels and the Spirit descend therein, by the permission of their Lord, with all decrees.
(The night is) Peace until the rising of the dawn.
Those who disbelieve among the People of the Scripture and the idolaters could not have left off (erring) till the clear proof came unto them,
A messenger from Allah, reading purified pages
Containing correct scriptures.
Nor were the People of the Scripture divided until after the clear proof came unto them.
And they are ordered naught else than to serve Allah, keeping religion pure for Him, as men by nature upright, and to establish worship and to pay the poor-due. That is true religion.
Lo! those who disbelieve, among the People of the Scripture and the idolaters, will abide in fire of hell. They are the worst of created beings.
(And) lo! those who believe and do good works are the best of created beings.
Their reward is with their Lord: Gardens of Eden underneath which rivers flow, wherein they dwell for ever. Allah hath pleasure in them and they have pleasure in Him. This is (in store) for him who feareth his Lord.
When Earth is shaken with her (final) earthquake
And Earth yieldeth up her burdens,
And man saith: What aileth her ?
That day she will relate her chronicles,
Because thy Lord inspireth her.
That day mankind will issue forth in scattered groups to be shown their deeds.
And whoso doeth good an atoms weight will see it then,
And whoso doeth ill an atoms weight will see it then.
By the snorting courses,
Striking sparks of fire
And scouring to the raid at dawn,
Then, therewith, with their trail of dust,
Cleaving, as one, the centre (of the foe),
Lo! man is an ingrate unto his Lord
And lo! he is a witness unto that;
And lo! in the love of wealth he is violent.
Knoweth he not that, when the contents of the graves are poured forth
And the secrets of the breasts are made known,
On that day will their Lord be perfectly informed concerning them.
The Calamity!
What is the Calamity ?
Ah, what will convey unto thee what the Calamity is!
A day wherein mankind will be as thickly-scattered moths
And the mountains will become as carded wool.
Then, as for him whose scales are heavy (with good works),
He will live a pleasant life.
But as for him whose scales are light,
A bereft and Hungry One will be his mother,
Ah, what will convey unto thee what she is! -
Raging Fire.
Rivalry in worldly increase distracteth you
Until ye come to the graves.
Nay, but ye will come to know!
Nay, but ye will come to know!
Nay, would that ye knew (now) with a sure knowledge!
For ye will behold hell-fire.
Aye, ye will behold it with sure vision.
Then, on that day, ye will be asked concerning pleasure.
By the declining day,
Lo! man is a state of loss,
Save those who believe and do good works, and exhort one another to truth and exhort one another to endurance.
Woe unto every slandering traducer,
Who hath gathered wealth (of this world) and arranged it.
He thinketh that his wealth will render him immortal.
Nay, but verily he will be flung to the Consuming One.
Ah, what will convey unto thee what the Consuming One is!
(It is) the fire of Allah, kindled,
Which leapeth up over the hearts (of men).
Lo! it is closed in on them
In outstretched columns.
Hast thou not seen how thy Lord dealt with the owners of the Elephant ?
Did He not bring their stratagem to naught,
And send against them swarms of flying creatures,
Which pelted them with stones of baked clay,
And made them like green crops devoured (by cattle) ?
For the taming of Qureysh.
For their taming (We cause) the caravans to set forth in winter and summer.
So let them worship the Lord of this House,
Who hath fed them against hunger and hath made them safe from fear.
Hast thou observed him who belieth religion ?
That is he who repelleth the orphan,
And urgeth not the feeding of the needy.
Ah, woe unto worshippers
Who are heedless of their prayer;
Who would be seen (at worship)
Yet refuse small kindnesses!
Lo! We have given thee Abundance;
So pray unto thy Lord, and sacrifice.
Lo! it is thy insulter (and not thou) who is without posterity.
Say: O disbelievers!
I worship not that which ye worship;
Nor worship ye that which I worship.
And I shall not worship that which ye worship.
Nor will ye worship that which I worship.
Unto you your religion, and unto me my religion.
When Allahs succour and the triumph cometh
And thou seest mankind entering the religion of Allah in troops,
Then hymn the praises of thy Lord, and seek forgiveness of Him. Lo! He is ever ready to show mercy.
The power of Abu Lahab will perish, and he will perish.
His wealth and gains will not exempt him.
He will be plunged in flaming Fire,
And his wife, the wood-carrier,
Will have upon her neck a halter of palm-fibre.
Say: He is Allah, the One!
Allah, the eternally Besought of all!
He begetteth not nor was begotten.
And there is none comparable unto Him.
Say: I seek refuge in the Lord of the Daybreak
From the evil of that which He created;
From the evil of the darkness when it is intense,
And from the evil of malignant witchcraft,
And from the evil of the envier when he envieth.
Say: I seek refuge in the Lord of mankind,
The King of mankind,
The God of mankind,
From the evil of the sneaking whisperer,
Who whispereth in the hearts of mankind,
Of the jinn and of mankind.
